tr: Hidrolik direksiyon sıvısı formülasyonu: ATF bazlı (Dexron/Mercon tarzı); Merkezi hidrolik yağı (CHF); Özel hidrolik direksiyon yağı; Elektro hidrolik direksiyon (EHPS) yağı; Sızıntı önleyici hidrolik direksiyon yağı; Evrensel / çoklu araç; Diğer
ja: パワーステアリングフルードの配合: ATFベース (デキシロン/マーコンスタイル); セントラルハイドロリックフルード (CHF); 専用パワーステアリングフルード; 電動油圧パワーステアリング (EHPS) フルード; 漏れ止めパワーステアリングフルード; ユニバーサル / 全車種対応; その他
nl: Stuurbekrachtigingsvloeistof formulering: Op ATF-basis (Dexron/Mercon-stijl); Centrale hydraulische vloeistof (CHF); Speciale stuurbekrachtigingsvloeistof; Elektro-hydraulische stuurbekrachtigingsvloeistof (EHPS); Stuurbekrachtigingsvloeistof met stop-leak; Universeel/meerdere voertuigen; Overig
bg-BG: Състав на течността за хидравлично сервоуправление: На базата на ATF (тип Dexron/Mercon); Централна хидравлична течност (CHF); Специализирана течност за сервоуправление; Течност за електрохидравлично сервоуправление (EHPS); Течност за сервоуправление срещу течове; Универсална / за различни автомобили; Друго
sv: Formulering av servostyrningsvätska: ATF-baserad (Dexron-/Mercon-stil); Centralhydraulikvätska (CHF); Specifik servostyrningsolja; Vätska för elektrohydraulisk servostyrning (EHPS); Servostyrningsolja med läckagestopp; Universell / för flera fordon; Annat
ko: 파워 스티어링 오일 배합: ATF 기반(Dexron/Mercon 스타일); 중앙 유압유(CHF); 전용 파워 스티어링 오일; 전기 유압식 파워 스티어링(EHPS) 오일; 누유 방지 파워 스티어링 오일; 범용/다중 차량용; 기타
pt-PT: Formulação do fluido de direção assistida: À base de ATF (estilo Dexron/Mercon); Fluido hidráulico central (CHF); Fluido de direção assistida dedicado; Fluido de direção assistida eletro-hidráulica (EHPS); Fluido de direção assistida tapa-fugas; Universal/múltiplos veículos; Outro
de: Formulierung der Servolenkungsflüssigkeit: Auf ATF-Basis (Typ Dexron/Mercon); Zentralhydraulikflüssigkeit (CHF); Spezielle Servolenkungsflüssigkeit; Flüssigkeit für elektrohydraulische Servolenkung (EHPS); Servolenkungsflüssigkeit mit Leckstopp; Universal/Mehrfahrzeug; Sonstige
hr-HR: Formulacija tekućine za servo upravljač: Na bazi ATF-a (stil Dexron/Mercon); Centralna hidraulična tekućina (CHF); Namjenska tekućina za servo upravljač; Tekućina za elektrohidraulični servo upravljač (EHPS); Tekućina za servo upravljač s brtvilom; Univerzalna / za više vozila; Ostalo
ru: Формула жидкости для гидроусилителя руля: На основе ATF (типа Dexron/Mercon); Центральная гидравлическая жидкость (CHF); Специализированная жидкость для ГУР; Жидкость для электрогидроусилителя руля (ЭГУР); Жидкость для ГУР с герметиком (стоп-течь); Универсальная / для различных автомобилей; Другое
pl: Formuła płynu do wspomagania kierownicy: Na bazie płynu ATF (typu Dexron/Mercon); Centralny płyn hydrauliczny (CHF); Dedykowany płyn do wspomagania układu kierowniczego; Płyn do elektrohydraulicznego układu kierowniczego (EHPS); Płyn do wspomagania uszczelniający (stop-leak); Uniwersalny / do różnych pojazdów; Inne
zh-CN: 动力转向液配方类型: ATF 基（Dexron/Mercon 风格）; 中央液压油 (CHF); 专用动力转向液; 电动液压助力转向 (EHPS) 液; 防漏动力转向液; 通用 / 多车型适用; 其他
zh-TW: 動力方向機油配方: ATF 基底 (Dexron/Mercon 規格); 中央液壓油 (CHF); 專用動力方向盤油; 電子液壓動力轉向系統 (EHPS) 用油; 止漏動力方向盤油; 通用 / 多車款適用; 其他
pt-BR: Fluido da direção hidráulica formulação: À base de ATF (tipo Dexron/Mercon); Fluido hidráulico central (CHF); Fluido específico para direção hidráulica; Fluido para direção eletro-hidráulica (EHPS); Fluido para direção hidráulica com selante contra vazamento; Universal / multiveículos; Outros
ro-RO: Formulă de lichid pentru servodirecție: Pe bază de ATF (stil Dexron/Mercon); Lichid hidraulic central (CHF); Lichid de servodirecție dedicat; Lichid pentru servodirecție electrohidraulică (EHPS); Lichid de servodirecție cu oprire scurgeri; Universal / pentru mai multe vehicule; Altele
hu: Szervokormány-folyadék összetétele: ATF alapú (Dexron/Mercon stílusú); Központi hidraulikaolaj (CHF); Célzott szervokormány-folyadék; Elektrohidraulikus szervokormány (EHPS) folyadék; Szivárgásgátló szervokormány-folyadék; Univerzális / több gépjárműhöz; Egyéb
cs: Složení kapaliny posilovače řízení: Na bázi ATF (typ Dexron/Mercon); Centrální hydraulická kapalina (CHF); Speciální kapalina do posilovače řízení; Kapalina pro elektrohydraulický posilovač řízení (EHPS); Kapalina do posilovače řízení s utěsněním; Univerzální / pro více vozidel; Jiné
fr: Formulation du liquide de direction assistée: À base de fluide de transmission (type Dexron/Mercon); Fluide hydraulique central (CHF); Liquide de direction assistée spécifique; Liquide de direction électro-hydraulique (EHPS); Liquide de direction assistée anti-fuite; Universel / multi-véhicules; Autre
sk-SK: Zloženie kvapaliny posilňovača riadenia: Na báze ATF (v štýle Dexron/Mercon); Centrálna hydraulická kvapalina (CHF); Špeciálna kvapalina do posilňovača riadenia; Kvapalina do elektrohydraulického posilňovača riadenia (EHPS); Kvapalina do posilňovača riadenia na utesnenie; Univerzálna/pre viaceré vozidlá; Iné
vi: Công thức dầu trợ lực lái: Gốc ATF (Kiểu Dexron/Mercon); Dầu thủy lực trung tâm (CHF); Dầu trợ lực lái chuyên dụng; Dầu trợ lực lái điện - thủy lực (EHPS); Dầu trợ lực lái chống rò rỉ; Dùng chung / dùng cho nhiều loại xe; Khác
lt-LT: Vairo stiprintuvo skysčio formulė: Pagaminta ATF pagrindu („Dexron“ / „Mercon“ stilius); Centrinio hidraulinio stiprintuvo skystis (CHF); Specialus vairo stiprintuvo skystis; Elektrohidraulinio vairo stiprintuvo (EHPS) skystis; Nuotėkį stabdantis vairo stiprintuvo skystis; Universalus / tinkamas įvairioms transporto priemonėms; Kita
da: Formulering af servostyringsvæske: ATF-baseret (Dexron/Mercon-type); Centralhydraulikvæske (CHF); Dedikeret servostyringsvæske; Væske til elektrohydraulisk servostyring (EHPS); Servostyringsvæske med lækagestop; Universel / til flere køretøjer; Andet
es: Formulación del fluido de dirección asistida: A base de ATF (estilo Dexron/Mercon); Líquido hidráulico central (CHF); Líquido de dirección asistida exclusivo; Líquido de dirección asistida electrohidráulica (EHPS); Líquido de dirección asistida tapafugas; Universal / multivehículo; Otro
sl-SI: Sestava tekočine za servo volan: Na osnovi ATF (slog Dexron/Mercon); Centralna hidravlična tekočina (CHF); Namenska tekočina za servokrmiljenje; Tekočina za elektrohidravlično servokrmiljenje (EHPS); Tekočina za servokrmiljenje proti puščanju; Univerzalno/za več vrst vozil; Drugo
it: Formulazione del fluido per servosterzo: A base ATF (tipo Dexron/Mercon); Fluido idraulico centrale (CHF); Fluido dedicato per servosterzo; Fluido per servosterzo elettroidraulico (EHPS); Fluido turafalle per servosterzo; Universale/multiveicolo; Altro
fi: Ohjaustehostinnesteen koostumusryhmä: ATF-pohjainen (Dexron/Mercon -tyyppinen); Keskushydrauliikkaneste (CHF); Erityinen ohjaustehostinneste; Sähköhydraulisen ohjaustehostimen (EHPS) neste; Vuotoja pysäyttävä ohjaustehostinneste; Yleiskäyttöinen / usealle ajoneuvolle; Muu
nb: Formulering av servostyringsvæske: ATF-basert (Dexron/Mercon-type); Sentralhydraulikkvæske (CHF); Dedikert servostyringsvæske; Væske for elektrohydraulisk servostyring (EHPS); Servostyringsvæske med lekkasjestopp; Universell / for flere kjøretøy; Annet
th: สูตรน้ำมันพาวเวอร์พวงมาลัย: สูตร ATF (สไตล์ Dexron/Mercon); น้ำมันไฮดรอลิกกลาง (CHF); น้ำมันพวงมาลัยพาวเวอร์เฉพาะ; น้ำมันพวงมาลัยพาวเวอร์แบบอิเล็กโทรไฮดรอลิก (EHPS); น้ำมันพวงมาลัยพาวเวอร์อุดรอยรั่ว; อเนกประสงค์ / สำหรับรถยนต์หลายรุ่น; อื่นๆ
el: Σύνθεση υγρού υδραυλικού τιμονιού: Με βάση το ATF (τύπου Dexron/Mercon); Κεντρικό υδραυλικό υγρό (CHF); Ειδικό υγρό υδραυλικού τιμονιού; Υγρό ηλεκτροϋδραυλικού τιμονιού (EHPS); Υγρό υδραυλικού τιμονιού Stop-Leak; Γενικής χρήσης / πολλαπλών οχημάτων; Άλλο
en: Power steering fluid formulation: ATF-based (Dexron/Mercon style); Central hydraulic fluid (CHF); Dedicated power steering fluid; Electro-hydraulic power steering (EHPS) fluid; Stop-leak power steering fluid; Universal / multi-vehicle; Other